Missouri, session 2026, SB1805.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 163, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 163.039, to read as
follows:
163.039. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
163.031 and 163.044 to the contrary, beginning in school
year 2026-27 and for each subsequent school year, none of
the following school districts shall receive state aid
calculated under subsection 2 of section 163.031, and no
such district shall receive any funds under section 163.044:
(1) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a village with more than sixty but fewer than
sixty-seven inhabitants and located in a county with more
than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with fewer than four
hundred eighty inhabitants;
(2) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a city with more than four hundred thirty but
fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants and that is the
county seat of a county with more than seven thousand but
fewer than eight thousand inhabitants;

SB 1805 2
(3) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a city with more than one hundred sixty-five but
fewer than one hundred eighty-five inhabitants and located
in a county with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred
but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than seven thousand but
fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;
(4) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a city with more than two hundred ninety-three but
fewer than three hundred forty inhabitants and located in a
county with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but
fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than seven thousand but fewer
than nine thousand inhabitants;
(5) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a city with more than four hundred thirty but
fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants and located in a
county with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but
fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than seven thousand but fewer
than nine thousand inhabitants;
(6) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a city with more than six hundred but fewer than
six hundred eighty inhabitants and located in a county with
more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than seven thousand but fewer than nine
thousand inhabitants; and
(7) A school district whose boundaries wholly
encompass a city with more than four hundred thirty but
fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants and located in a
county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than

SB 1805 3
twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than nine hundred but fewer than one thousand four
hundred inhabitants.
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section
163.011 to the contrary, beginning in school year 2026-27
and for each subsequent school year, the state aid
calculation for the school districts delineated in
subdivision (4) of this subsection shall be calculated using
the definition of "local effort" contained in subsection 4
of this section and not the definition of "local effort"
provided in section 163.011.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 163.044
to the contrary, beginning in school year 2026-27 and for
each subsequent school year, no school district delineated
in subdivision (4) of this subsection shall receive any
funds under section 163.044.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 163.031
to the contrary, beginning in school year 2026-27 and for
each subsequent school year, no school district delineated
in subdivision (4) of this subsection shall receive state
aid calculated under subsection 2 of section 163.031.
(4) Subdivisions (1) to (3) of this subsection apply
to the following school districts:
(a) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
a city with more than two hundred sixty but fewer than two
hundred ninety-three inhabitants and located in a county
with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than seven thousand but fewer than nine
thousand inhabitants;
(b) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
a city with more than seven hundred sixty but fewer than

SB 1805 4
eight hundred fifty-five inhabitants and located in a county
with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with fewer than four
hundred eighty inhabitants;
(c) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
a city with more than nine hundred fifty-five but fewer than
one thousand sixty inhabitants and located in a county with
more than nine thousand nine hundred but fewer than eleven
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
two thousand five hundred but fewer than three thousand five
hundred inhabitants; and
(d) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
a city with more than one thousand sixty but fewer than one
thousand one hundred seventy inhabitants and partially
located in a county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than two thousand five hundred but
fewer than three thousand five hundred inhabitants.
100 3. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section
101 163.011 to the contrary, beginning in school year 2026-27
102 and for each subsequent school year, the state aid
103 calculation for any school district delineated in
104 subdivision (3) of this subsection shall be calculated using
105 the definition of "local effort" contained in subsection 4
106 of this section and not the definition of "local effort"
107 provided in section 163.011.
108 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 163.031
109 to the contrary, beginning in school year 2026-27 and for
110 each subsequent school year, no school district delineated
111 in subdivision (3) of this subsection shall receive state
112 aid calculated under subsection 2 of section 163.031.

SB 1805 5
113 (3) Subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection apply
114 to the following school districts:
115 (a) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
116 a city with more than one thousand five hundred but fewer
117 than one thousand seven hundred inhabitants and located in a
118 county with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight
119 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with fewer than
120 four hundred eighty inhabitants;
121 (b) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
122 a city with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight
123 thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
124 with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
125 seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants;
126 (c) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
127 a city with more than two thousand seven hundred but fewer
128 than three thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
129 more than nine thousand nine hundred but fewer than eleven
130 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
131 two thousand five hundred but fewer than three thousand five
132 hundred inhabitants; and
133 (d) A school district whose boundaries wholly contain
134 a city with more than one thousand three hundred but fewer
135 than one thousand five hundred inhabitants and that is the
136 county seat of a county with more than twenty-two thousand
137 but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants.
138 4. For purposes of this section only, "local effort"
139 shall mean the following calculation: For each fiscal year
140 calculation, local effort shall be computed as the equalized
141 assessed valuation of the property of a school district in
142 calendar year 2024 divided by one hundred and multiplied by
143 the performance levy less the percentage retained by the
144 county assessor and collector plus one hundred percent of

SB 1805 6
145 the amount received in fiscal year 2025 for school purposes
146 from intangible taxes, fines, escheats, payments in lieu of
147 taxes and receipts from state-assessed railroad and utility
148 tax, one hundred percent of the amount received for school
149 purposes pursuant to the merchants' and manufacturers' taxes
150 under sections 150.010 to 150.370, one hundred percent of
151 the amounts received for school purposes from federal
152 properties under sections 12.070 and 12.080 except when such
153 amounts are used in the calculation of federal impact aid
154 pursuant to Pub. L. 81-874, fifty percent of Proposition C
155 revenues received for school purposes from the school
156 district trust fund under section 163.087, and one hundred
157 percent of any local earnings or income taxes received by
158 the district for school purposes.
✓